src/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON Adverbs
  Adverb ;

LEXICON Adverb
Multiwords ; 
Advs ; 
Locational ; 

! These may be something else
LEXICON Locational 
badaal      AdvEnd_ "backward, taaksepäin" ;

LEXICON Advs
aad			AdvEnd_ "much" ;
badan		AdvEnd_ "many" ;
baddan		AdvEnd_/NG "many" ;
xataa		AdvEnd_ "even" ;
wanaag		AdvEnd_ "well" ;
lamafilaan  AdvEnd_ "by chance, suddenly" ;

! The rest aren't really adverbs... 
! These have morphology
halkaas		AdvEnd	"there"                           ; 
halkan		AdvEnd	"here"                           ; 
markaas		AdvEnd	"at that time, when"              ; 
alla        AdvEnd  "ever, whoever, whatever" ;

maanta		AdvEnd	"today" ; 
maantadan	AdvEnd	"this day" ; 
berrito		AdvEnd	"tomorrow" ;
berri		AdvEnd	"tomorrow" ;
shalayto    AdvEnd  "yesterday" ;
shalay      AdvEnd  "yesterday" ;
xalayto    AdvEnd  "last night" ;
xalay      AdvEnd  "last night, at night" ;
sow         AdvEnd  "thus" ;
wal         AdvEnd  "? mar walba - always" ;



LEXICON Misc
kala		AdvEnd 	"separately" ; ! adv or verbal particle thing?
wada		AdvEnd	"together" ;

!!€gt-norm: shalayto # Adverbs exist test
!!€ shalayto:            shalayto+Adv
!!€ wada:                wada+Adv
!!€ oeiwajfoeij:         wada+Adv

! What to do with these?
LEXICON Multiwords
marka% hore		AdvEnd 	"firstly"                      ;
khaas% ahaan	AdvEnd 		"especially"               ;
isla% markaasi	AdvEnd 		"at the same time"         ;
ka% dib			AdvEnd 	"afterwards, after"            ;
! Some of these probably shouldn't be here?
ilaa			AdvEnd "until" ;
hubaal			AdvEnd "surely" ;
aalaa		AdvEnd ;
ahaateenaa		AdvEnd ;
ammaa		AdvEnd ;
armaa		AdvEnd ;
ash		AdvEnd ;
aslan		AdvEnd ;
badanaa		AdvEnd ;
balki		AdvEnd ;
berrito		AdvEnd ;
billaa		AdvEnd ;
bilmasal		AdvEnd ;
bilqasab		AdvEnd ;
calaa-xaal		AdvEnd ;
ciyow		AdvEnd ;
dabcan		AdvEnd ;
dalaadala		AdvEnd ;
dambeeto		AdvEnd ;
dambow		AdvEnd ;
dar-alla		AdvEnd ;
dawaali		AdvEnd ;
dee		AdvEnd ;
deeb		AdvEnd ;
dhaaxa		AdvEnd ;
haatan		AdvEnd ;
haddaayey		AdvEnd ;
haddee		AdvEnd ;
hadhow		AdvEnd ;
halhaleel		AdvEnd ;
hanuun		AdvEnd ;
haye		AdvEnd ;
hee		AdvEnd ;
horay		AdvEnd ;
hore		AdvEnd ;
inta		AdvEnd ;
kaddib		AdvEnd ;
kistoo		AdvEnd ;
kolla		AdvEnd ;
kolley		AdvEnd ;
laasim		AdvEnd ;
labaddaraadle		AdvEnd ;
maanta		AdvEnd ;
malaha		AdvEnd ;
marxabba		AdvEnd ;
masalan		AdvEnd ;
meetan		AdvEnd ;
mindhaa		AdvEnd ;
min		AdvEnd ;
saaddambe		AdvEnd ;
saaka		AdvEnd ;
saakuun		AdvEnd ;
saas		AdvEnd ;
saatan		AdvEnd ;
saa		AdvEnd ;
siiba		AdvEnd ;
sugukuun		AdvEnd ;
tahna		AdvEnd ;
tan		AdvEnd ;
taniyo		AdvEnd ;
uun		AdvEnd ;
xataa		AdvEnd ;
yacni		AdvEnd ;
yare		AdvEnd ;

LEXICON AdvEnd_
+Adv: 		# ;

LEXICON AdvEnd_/NG
+Adv+Use/NG: 		FINAL ;

LEXICON AdvEnd
+Adv: 		Clitics ; 


! vim: set ts=4 sw=4 tw=0 syntax=lexc :
